Louisiana, session 2026, HB571.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 13:842.4(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
7 §842.4. Complex Litigation Section Pilot Program; filing fees; Nineteenth Judicial
8 District Court
9 * * *
10 D. The pilot program authorized by this Section shall be effective for a period
11 of two years, unless extended by the legislature terminate on July 31, 2028.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.